Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3101
Court proceeding; notice to noncustodial parent.

A noncustodial parent shall be defined as an interested person, and reasonable attempts shall be made to notify him or her of any court proceeding taken (1) by, against, or on behalf of his or her child or (2) by, against, or on behalf of the custodial parent if such court proceeding affects the child. The noncustodial parent need not be present at the commencement of such court proceeding.

Laws 1994, LB 451, § 3.